District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.04

Advisory Neighborhood Commissions — Petition required; established by resolution.

(a)

As soon as possible after October 10, 1975, but in no case later than 5 days after such date, the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics (hereinafter in this part referred to as the “Board”) shall:

(1)

Make available to any resident of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission area copies of petition forms for collecting signatures of registered qualified electors in such area; and

(2)

Publish in the District of Columbia Register and in at least 2 newspapers of general circulation in the District of Columbia, the number of registered qualified electors in each Advisory Neighborhood Commission area.

(b)

Upon certification by the Board to the Chairman of the Council that 5 percent of the registered qualified electors of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission area have signed a petition calling for the establishment of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission in such area, the Council shall then establish by resolution a nonpartisan elected Advisory Neighborhood Commission for such area, with its members to be elected from the single-member districts established for such area. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit an individual to sign more than 1 petition for the establishment of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission.

History

Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 5, 22 DCR 2067
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 4, 22 DCR 2472
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-111, § 2(a), 31 DCR 3952

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-255.
1973 Ed., § 1-171c.

References in Text

“This act,” referred to in subsection (a) of this section, is the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, D.C. Law 1-21.